Rhode Island, session 2025, SB538.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 112.1
THE RHODE ISLAND CIVIL RIGHTS ENFORCEMENT ACT
42-112.1-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "the Rhode Island Civil Rights
Enforcement Act."
42-112.1-2. Purpose.
It is the dual purpose of this chapter to ensure that:
(1) Consistent with the admonition contained in Article I, Section 5 of the Constitution of
the State of Rhode Island, every right shall have a remedy; and
(2) As between an innocent party whose rights have been violated by acts and/or omissions
of a governmental entity, as defined in this chapter, and/or agents thereof, it is the governmental
entity and/or agents thereof that shall bear the cost of any harm caused by such violation of rights,
not the innocent party.
42-112.1-3. Definition.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Aggrieved party" means any resident of the State of Rhode Island or other individual

within the State of Rhode Island subjected to the deprivation of any rights, privileges or immunities
secured by the Constitution and laws of the State of Rhode Island in a manner proscribed by this
chapter.
(2) "Governmental entity" means the State of Rhode Island or any of its political or
administrative subdivisions, including any municipal, quasi-municipal, or quasi-state entity, and
any state of the United States, the United States, or a foreign nation state, including any political or
administrative subdivision of any of the foregoing entities.
42-112.1-4. Cause of Action.
(a) Every person who, under color of any statute, ordinance, regulation, custom or usage
of a governmental entity subjects, or causes to be subjected, any resident of the State of Rhode
Island or other individual within the State of Rhode Island to the deprivation of any rights,
privileges or immunities secured by the Constitution and laws of the State of Rhode Island, shall
be liable to the aggrieved party in an action at law, suit in equity, and/or other proper proceeding
for redress, provided nothing herein shall abrogate any existing immunities of any person liable for
a violation under this subsection.
(b) A governmental entity shall be liable for any harm caused to an aggrieved party
subjected to a deprivation proscribed under subsection (a) of this section if the person that caused
the deprivation was acting within the scope of their employment, agency or other authority or color
of law conferred by the governmental entity, regardless of any immunities from liability from suit
that such person may have and regardless of any governmental or sovereign immunities of the State
of Rhode Island or any political or administrative subdivision thereof, which said immunities are
hereby expressly waived as to the State of Rhode Island and its political or administrative
subdivisions; provided that, nothing in this chapter abrogates judicial or legislative immunity.
(c) In any action brought under this chapter, an aggrieved party subjected to a deprivation
proscribed under subsection (a) of this section need not identify or join as a party the person or
persons who caused the deprivation and may bring an action under this chapter solely against the
governmental entity liable for the deprivation under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) A governmental entity shall also be liable for any harm sustained by an aggrieved party
that was caused by any custom, policy, regulation, ordinance, or law of that governmental entity.
42-112.1-5. Remedies.
(a) An aggrieved party subjected to a deprivation proscribed under this chapter shall be
entitled to all the rights and remedies available at law and equity including, but not limited to,
declaratory and injunctive relief and compensatory and punitive damages; provided that, neither
the State of Rhode Island, nor any of its political or administrative subdivisions, shall be liable for
LC001277 - Page 2 of 4

punitive damages arising out of liability imposed under §§ 42-112.1-4(b) through (d).
(b) In any action brought under this chapter, a prevailing aggrieved party subjected to a
deprivation proscribed by this chapter shall also be entitled to an award of reasonable counsel fees
as well as costs, prejudgment interest, and expert witness fees reasonably incurred in bringing the
action.
(c) An aggrieved party shall be considered prevailing if that party succeeds, in whole or in
part, in obtaining relief for a deprivation proscribed under this chapter by bringing an action under
this chapter, whether the relief is obtained as a result of a judgment, settlement, or the voluntary
change in behavior of the governmental entity after the filing of an action.
(d) An action under this chapter may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction
within three (3) years from the date of the deprivation proscribed under this chapter or from the
date when the aggrieved party knew or should have known of the acts and/or omissions giving rise
to the deprivation, whichever is later in time.
42-112.1-6. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or
circumstances is adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, this invalidity shall
not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be
severable.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001277
========
LC001277 - Page 3 of 4